Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201590-559
Department of Correctional Services; Operations.

FY2015-16FY2016-17GENERAL FUND200,125,515191,191,700CASH FUND2,126,0002,126,000FEDERAL FUND est.1,758,0211,762,858REVOLVING FUND est.18,780,83518,935,977PROGRAM TOTAL222,790,371214,016,535SALARY LIMIT105,894,527105,496,351

The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2015, is hereby reappropriated.

Included in the salary limitations provided by this section is $3,672,087 for FY2015-16 and $3,672,087 for FY2016-17 for Revolving Fund salaries for program classifications 390 and 563, that shall not be limited to the amounts shown.

The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations and expenditures for this program according to the following program classifications:

No. 260 - Nebraska Correctional Youth Facility

No. 300 - Tecumseh Correctional Center

No. 368 - Lincoln Community Corrections Center

No. 369 - Omaha Community Corrections Center

No. 370 - Central Office

No. 372 - Nebraska State Penitentiary

No. 373 - Nebraska Center for Women - York

No. 375 - Diagnostic and Evaluation Center

No. 376 - Lincoln Correctional Center

No. 377 - Omaha Correctional Center

No. 386 - McCook Incarceration Work Camp

No. 389 - Adult Parole Administration

No. 390 - Federal Surplus Property

No. 495 - Department Central Warehouse

No. 563 - Correctional Industries

Revolving Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amounts shown.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Correctional Services investigate the feasibility of leasing the former Lancaster County jail facility located in Air Park and owned by the Airport Authority of the City of Lincoln, Nebraska, and consider making this facility a community corrections facility instead of a minimum-security facility. The department shall issue a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature electronically on this subject by January 1, 2016.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Correctional Services reduce mandatory overtime at the department's facilities. The department shall examine reducing mandatory overtime by studying its pay structure, including, but not limited to, adopting a pay structure that allows employees to advance through the pay line, adopting a step plan or a similar-type plan, or by adopting another method that gives incentives for employees to remain employed by the department. The department may conduct a salary survey to see if the department's salaries are competitive with other entities which it competes with for employees. The department shall issue a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature electronically on this subject by January 1, 2016.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Correctional Services implement a needs assessment regarding behavioral and mental health treatment and staffing. The needs assessment shall be completed by appropriately trained mental health professionals. The assessment shall include:

(1) Review and summary of relevant existing data sources;

(2) A detailed review of need factors in the Department of Correctional Services population including risk behaviors, mental health needs, behavioral health needs, and diagnosis;

(3) A detailed review of existing treatment and analysis of the adequacy of that treatment based on:

(a) Professional standards of care;

(b) Best practices;

(c) Availability of programming aligned with mental health needs and diagnosis (using valid instrumentation); and

(d) Availability in different facilities and levels of custody; and

(4) Analysis of needs, based on data gathered regarding:

(a) Staffing needs to meet professional standards of care;

(b) Needs related to developing new or different treatment based on needs analysis; and

(c) Needs related to achieving an appropriate level of service that meets the goals of institutional and community safety and community integration.

The department shall issue a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature electronically on this subject by January 1, 2016.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2015-16 $5,000,000 General Funds, which shall only be used to contract with county jail facilities to house Department of Correctional Services facilities inmates on a temporary basis. If the department estimates that the need to contract with county jail facilities to house department facilities inmates still exists in FY2016-17, the department may request General Funds for this purpose. It is the intent of the Legislature that no further funding be provided after FY2016-17 to contract with county jail facilities to house Department of Correctional Services facilities inmates.

It is intended that the Department of Correctional Services shall maintain a Department Contingency Fund and a Department Equipment Fund.

Laws 2015, LB598A, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB605A, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB657, § 162.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB657, section 162, with LB598A, section 1, and LB605A, section 1, to reflect all amendments.Laws 2015, LB657, became operative July 1, 2015. Changes made by LB598A and LB605A became effective August 30, 2015.